Ohio, session 136, SB377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3312.01, 3313.41, 3313.413, and 3313.843 be amended and sections 3318.80 and 3318.81 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3312.01. (A) The educational regional service system is hereby established. The system shall support state and regional education initiatives and efforts to improve school effectiveness and student achievement. Services, including special education and related services, shall be provided under the system to school districts, community schools established under Chapter 3314. of the Revised Code, and chartered nonpublic schools. It is the intent of the general assembly that the educational regional service system reduce the unnecessary duplication of programs and services and provide for a more streamlined and efficient delivery of educational services without reducing the availability of the services needed by school districts and schools. (B) The educational regional service system shall consist of the following: (1) The advisory councils and subcommittees established under sections 3312.03 and 3312.05 of the Revised Code; (2) A fiscal agent for each of the regions as configured under section 3312.02 of the Revised Code; (3) Educational service centers, information technology centers established under section 3301.075 of the Revised Code, and other regional education service providers. (C) Educational service centers shall provide the services that they are specifically required to provide by the Revised Code and may enter into agreements pursuant to section 3313.843, 3313.844, or 3313.845 of the Revised Code for the provision of other services, which may include any of the following: (1) Assistance in improving student performance; (2) Services to enable a school district or school to operate more efficiently or economically; (3) Professional development for teachers or administrators; (4) Assistance in the recruitment and retention of teachers and administrators; (5) Applying for any state or federal grant on behalf of a school district; (6) Any other educational, administrative, or operational services. In addition to implementing state and regional education initiatives and school improvement efforts under the educational regional service system, educational service centers shall implement state or federally funded initiatives assigned to the service centers by the general assembly or the department of education and workforce. Any educational service center selected to be a fiscal agent for its region pursuant to section 3312.07 of the Revised Code shall continue to operate as an educational service center for the part of the region that comprises its territory. (D) An educational service center shall be considered a school district or a local education agency for the purposes of eligibility in applying for any state or competitive federal grant. Educational service centers are eligible to participate in and receive support through any grant programs that are available to school districts and focused on school facility health, safety, and welfare. (E) Information technology centers may enter into agreements for the provision of services pursuant to section 3312.10 of the Revised Code. (F) No school district, community school, or chartered nonpublic school shall be required to purchase services from an educational service center or information technology center in the region in which the district or school is located, except that a local school district shall receive any services required by the Revised Code to be provided by an educational service center to the local school districts in its territory from the educational service center in whose territory the district is located. Sec. 3313.41. (A) Except as provided in divisions (C), (D), and (F) of this section and in sections 3313.412 and 3313.413 of the Revised Code, when a board of education decides to dispose of real or personal property that it owns in its corporate capacity and that exceeds in value ten thousand dollars, it shall sell the property at public auction, after giving at least thirty days' notice of the auction by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district, by publication as provided in section 7.16 of the Revised Code, or by posting notices in five of the most public places in the school district in which the property, if it is real property, is situated, or, if it is personal property, in the school district of the board of education that owns the property. The board may offer real property for sale as an entire tract or in parcels. (B) When the board of education has offered real or personal property for sale at public auction at least once pursuant to division (A) of this section, and the property has not been sold, the board may sell it at a private sale. Regardless of how it was offered at public auction, at a private sale, the board shall, as it considers best, sell real property as an entire tract or in parcels, and personal property in a single lot or in several lots. (C) If a board of education decides to dispose of real or personal property that it owns in its corporate capacity and that exceeds in value ten thousand dollars, it may sell the property to the adjutant general; to any subdivision or taxing authority as respectively defined in section 5705.01 of the Revised Code, township park district, board of park commissioners established under Chapter 755. of the Revised Code, or park district established under Chapter 1545. of the Revised Code; to a wholly or partially tax-supported university, university branch, or college; to a nonprofit institution of higher education that has a certificate of authorization under Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code; to the governing authority of a chartered nonpublic school; to the governing board of an educational service center; or to the board of trustees of a school district library, upon such terms as are agreed upon. The sale of real or personal property to the board of trustees of a school district library is limited, in the case of real property, to a school district library within whose boundaries the real property is situated, or, in the case of personal property, to a school district library whose boundaries lie in whole or in part within the school district of the selling board of education. (D) When a board of education decides to trade as a part or an entire consideration, an item of personal property on the purchase price of an item of similar personal property, it may trade the same upon such terms as are agreed upon by the parties to the trade. (E) The president and the treasurer of the board of education shall execute and deliver deeds or other necessary instruments of conveyance to complete any sale or trade under this section. (F) When a board of education has identified a parcel of real property that it determines is needed for school purposes, the board may, upon a majority vote of the members of the board, acquire that property by exchanging real property that the board owns in its corporate capacity for the identified real property or by using real property that the board owns in its corporate capacity as part or an entire consideration for the purchase price of the identified real property. Any exchange or acquisition made pursuant to this division shall be made by a conveyance executed by the president and the treasurer of the board. (G) When a school district board of education has property that the board, by resolution, finds is not needed for school district use, is obsolete, or is unfit for the use for which it was acquired, the board may donate that property in accordance with this division if the fair market value of the property is, in the opinion of the board, two thousand five hundred dollars or less. The property may be donated to an eligible nonprofit organization that is located in this state and is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 501(a) and (c)(3). Before donating any property under this division, the board shall adopt a resolution expressing its intent to make unneeded, obsolete, or unfit-for-use school district property available to these organizations. The resolution shall include guidelines and procedures the board considers to be necessary to implement the donation program and shall indicate whether the school district will conduct the donation program or the board will contract with a representative to conduct it. If a representative is known when the resolution is adopted, the resolution shall provide contact information such as the representative's name, address, and telephone number. The resolution shall include within its procedures a requirement that any nonprofit organization desiring to obtain donated property under this division shall submit a written notice to the board or its representative. The written notice shall include evidence that the organization is a nonprofit organization that is located in this state and is exempt from federal income taxation pursuant to 26 U.S.C. 501(a) and (c)(3); a description of the organization's primary purpose; a description of the type or types of property the organization needs; and the name, address, and telephone number of a person designated by the organization's governing board to receive donated property and to serve as its agent. The written notice may be submitted electronically to the board or its representative. After adoption of the resolution, the board shall continually post in the board's office notice of its intent to donate school district property that is unneeded, obsolete, or unfit for use to eligible nonprofit organizations. If the school district maintains a web site on the internet, the notice shall be posted continually at that web site. The board or its representatives shall maintain a list of all nonprofit organizations that notify the board or its representative of their desire to obtain donated property under this division and that the board or its representative determines to be eligible, in accordance with the requirements set forth in this section and in the donation program's guidelines and procedures, to receive donated property. The board or its representative also shall maintain a list of all school district property the board finds to be unneeded, obsolete, or unfit for use and to be available for donation under this division. The list shall be posted continually in a conspicuous location in the board's office, and, if the school district maintains a web site on the internet, the list shall be posted continually at that web site. An item of property on the list shall be donated to the eligible nonprofit organization that first declares to the board or its representative its desire to obtain the item unless the board previously has established, by resolution, a list of eligible nonprofit organizations that shall be given priority with respect to the item's donation. Priority may be given on the basis that the purposes of a nonprofit organization have a direct relationship to specific school district purposes of programs provided or administered by the board. A resolution giving priority to certain nonprofit organizations with respect to the donation of an item of property shall specify the reasons why the organizations are given that priority. Members of the board shall consult with the Ohio ethics commission, and comply with Chapters 102. and 2921. of the Revised Code, with respect to any donation under this division to a nonprofit organization of which a board member, any member of a board member's family, or any business associate of a board member is a trustee, officer, board member, or employee. Sec. 3313.413. (A) As used in this section, "high-performing community school" means a community school established under Chapter 3314. of the Revise Revised Code that meets any of the following conditions: (1) Except as provided for in division (A)(2) or (3) of this section, the community school does both of the following: (a) The school has a higher performance index score than the school district in which the school is located on the two most recent report cards issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (b) The school either has a performance rating of four stars or higher for progress on the most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code or is a school described under division (B)(1) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code and did not receive a rating for progress on the most recent report card. (2) If the community school serves only grades kindergarten through three, the school received a performance rating of four stars or higher for early literacy on its most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. (3) If the community school has not commenced operations or has been in operation for less than one school year, the school meets the following conditions: (a) The school is replicating an operational and instructional model used by a community school described in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section. (b) The school either: (i) Has an operator that received an overall rating of three stars or higher, or a "C" or higher, on its most recent performance report published under section 3314.031 of the Revised Code; (ii) Does not have an operator and is sponsored by a sponsor that was rated "exemplary" or "effective" on its most recent evaluation conducted under section 3314.016 of the Revised Code. (B) When a school district board of education decides to dispose of real property it owns in its corporate capacity under section 3313.41 of the Revised Code, the board shall first offer that property to the governing authorities of all start-up community schools, the boards of trustees of any college-preparatory boarding schools, and the governing bodies of any STEM schools that are located within the territory of the district. Not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, interested governing authorities, boards of trustees, and governing bodies shall notify the district treasurer in writing of the intention to purchase the property. The district board shall give priority to the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that are located within the territory of the district. (1) If more than one governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the governing authorities of high-performing community schools that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (2) If no governing authority of a high-performing community school notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall then proceed with the offers from all other start-up community schools, college-preparatory boarding schools, and STEM schools made pursuant to that division. If more than one such entity notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the entities that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (3) If no governing authority, board of trustees, or governing body notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district shall then offer the property for sale to the governing board of any educational service center that shares territory with the district or that has territory that is adjacent to the district's territory. Not later than sixty days after the district board makes the offer, interested governing boards shall notify the district treasurer in writing of the intention to purchase the property. If more than one governing board notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district board shall conduct a public auction in the manner required for auctions of district property under division (A) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. Only the governing boards that notified the district treasurer pursuant to division (B) of this section are eligible to bid at the auction. (4) If no governing board notifies the district treasurer of its intention to purchase the property pursuant to division (B) of this section, the district may then offer the property for sale in the manner prescribed under divisions (A) to (F) of section 3313.41 of the Revised Code. (C) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in sections 3313.41 and 3313.411 of the Revised Code, the purchase price of any real property sold to any of the entities in accordance with division (B) of this section shall not be more than the appraised fair market value of that property as determined in an appraisal of the property that is not more than one year old. (D) Not later than the first day of October of each year, the department of education and workforce shall post in a prominent location on its web site a list of schools that qualify as high-performing community schools for purposes of this section and section 3313.411 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3313.843. (A) Notwithstanding division (D) of section 3311.52 of the Revised Code, this section does not apply to any cooperative education school district. (B)(1) The board of education of each city, exempted village, or local school district with an average daily student enrollment of sixteen thousand or less, reported for the district on the most recent report card issued under section 3302.03 of the Revised Code, shall enter into an agreement with the governing board of an educational service center, under which the educational service center governing board will provide services to the district. (2) The board of education of a city, exempted village, or local school district with an average daily student enrollment of more than sixteen thousand may enter into an agreement with the governing board of an educational service center, under which the educational service center governing board will provide services to the district. (3) Services provided under an agreement entered into under division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall be specified in the agreement, and may include any of the following: supervisory teachers; in-service and continuing education programs for district personnel; curriculum services; research and development programs; academic instruction for which the governing board employs teachers pursuant to section 3319.02 of the Revised Code; assistance in the provision of special accommodations and classes for students with disabilities; or any other services the district board and service center governing board agree can be better provided by the service center and are not provided under an agreement entered into under section 3313.845 of the Revised Code. Services included in the agreement shall be provided to the district in the manner specified in the agreement. The district board of education shall reimburse the educational service center governing board pursuant to division (H) of this section. (C) Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be filed with the department of education and workforce by the first day of July of the school year for which the agreement is in effect. (D)(1) An agreement for services from an educational service center entered into under this section may be terminated by the school district board of education, at its option, by notifying the governing board of the service center by March 1, 2012, or by the first day of January of any odd-numbered year thereafter, that the district board intends to terminate the agreement in that year, and that termination shall be effective on the thirtieth day of June of that year. The failure of a district board to notify an educational service center of its intent to terminate an agreement by March 1, 2012, shall result in renewal of the existing agreement for the following school year. Thereafter, the failure of a district board to notify an educational service center of its intent to terminate an agreement by the first day of January of an odd-numbered year shall result in renewal of the existing agreement for the following two school years. (2) If the school district that terminates an agreement for services under division (D)(1) of this section is also subject to the requirement of division (B)(1) of this section, the district board shall enter into a new agreement with any educational service center so that the new agreement is effective on the first day of July of that same year. (3) If all moneys owed by a school district to an educational service center under an agreement for services terminated under division (D)(1) of this section have been paid in full by the effective date of the termination, the governing board of the service center shall submit an affidavit to the department certifying that fact not later than fifteen days after the termination's effective date. Notwithstanding anything in the Revised Code to the contrary, until the department receives such an affidavit, it shall not make any payments to any other educational service center with which the district enters into an agreement under this section for services that the educational service center provides to the district. (E) An educational service center may apply to any state or federal agency for competitive grants. It may also apply to any private entity for additional funds. The department shall ensure that educational service centers are eligible to participate in any grant program that is available to school districts and focused on school facility health, safety, and welfare. (F) Not later than January 1, 2014, each educational service center shall post on its web site a list of all of the services that it provides and the corresponding cost for each of those services. (G)(1) For purposes of calculating any state operating subsidy to be paid to an educational service center for the operation of that service center and any services required under Title XXXIII of the Revised Code to be provided by the service center to a school district, the service center's student count shall be the sum of the total student counts of all the school districts with which the educational service center has entered into an agreement under this section. (2) When a district enters into a new agreement with a new educational service center, the department shall ensure that the state operating subsidy for services provided to the district is paid to the new educational service center and that the educational service center with which the district previously had an agreement is no longer paid a state operating subsidy for providing services to that district. (H) Pursuant to division (B) of section 3317.023 of the Revised Code, the department annually shall deduct from each school district that enters into an agreement with an educational service center under this section, and pay to the service center, an amount equal to six dollars and fifty cents times the school district's total student count. The district board of education, or the district superintendent acting on behalf of the district board, may agree to pay an amount in excess of six dollars and fifty cents per student in total student count. If a majority of the boards of education, or superintendents acting on behalf of the boards, of the districts that entered into an agreement under this section approve an amount in excess of six dollars and fifty cents per student in total student count, each district shall pay the excess amount to the service center. (I)(1) An educational service center may enter into a contract to purchase supplies, materials, equipment, and services, which may include those specified in division (B) of this section or Chapter 3312. of the Revised Code, or the delivery of such services, on behalf of a school district or political subdivision that has entered into an agreement with the service center under this section or section 3313.844, 3313.845, or 3313.846 of the Revised Code. (2) Purchases made by a school district or political subdivision that has entered into an agreement with the service center as described in this division are exempt from competitive bidding required by law for the purchase of supplies, materials, equipment, or services. No political subdivision shall make any purchase under this division when the political subdivision has received bids for such purchase, unless the same terms, conditions, and specifications at a lower price can be made for such purchase under this division. (J) Any school district, community school, or STEM school that has entered into an agreement with an educational service center under this section or section 3313.844 or 3313.845 of the Revised Code shall be in compliance with federal law and exempt from competitive bidding requirements for personnel-based services pursuant to the authority granted to the Ohio department of education and workforce under federal law, provided the service center has met the following conditions: (1) It is in compliance with division (F) of this section. (2) It has been designated "high performing" under rule of the department. (3) It has been found to be substantially in compliance with audit rules and guidelines in its most recent audit by the auditor of state. (K) For purposes of this section, a school district's "total student count" means the average daily student enrollment reported on the most recent report card issued for the district pursuant to section 3302.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3318.80. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Ohio facilities construction commission" has the same meaning as in section 3318.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Project" means a project to construct or acquire facilities or to reconstruct or make additions to existing facilities to be used for housing the applicable educational service center and its functions. (3) "Acquisition of facilities" means constructing, reconstructing, repairing, or making additions to facilities. (B) The educational service center facilities assistance program is established. Under the program, the Ohio facilities construction commission shall provide assistance to educational service centers for the acquisition of facilities to be used for operations or direct student services. (C) The commission shall adopt rules for the administration of the program. The rules shall include: (1) Eligibility requirements for educational service centers to receive assistance; (2) Application procedures; (3) Procedures for prioritizing projects; (4) Procedures for determining the local share of project costs; (5) Procedures for disbursing state funds. (D) The commission may provide assistance under this section in the form of grants, loans, or a combination of grants and loans. (E) The commission shall give priority to projects that demonstrate a local match through levy approval, building donation, land donation, or other in-kind contributions. Sec. 3318.81. (A) The educational service center revolving loan fund is created in the state treasury. The fund shall consist of money appropriated to it by the general assembly and any investment earnings on money in the fund. (B) The treasurer of state may use the fund to support deposit programs and loan guarantee programs for educational service centers to finance the acquisition, construction, or renovation of facilities used to provide direct student services. (C) The treasurer of state shall adopt rules necessary for the implementation and administration of this section. Section 2. That existing sections 3312.01, 3313.41, 3313.413, and 3313.843 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed.